Maine, session 132, LD482.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §5021, as amended by PL 2005, c. 151, §1, is further amended
to read:
§5021. Standards for participation in public schools by students enrolled in
equivalent instruction programs
A school administrative unit shall conform to the following standards in making public
school resources and services available to a student enrolled in a home an equivalent
instruction program under section 5001‑A, subsection 3, paragraph A, subparagraph (4)
for. For the purposes of this section, "student enrolled in an equivalent instruction program"
means a student otherwise eligible to attend school in that school administrative unit,
including a student who resides in the unorganized territory, when the student is enrolled
in an equivalent instruction program. For the purposes of this section, "equivalent
instruction program" means a school or instruction program that is recognized as an
equivalent instruction alternative under section 5001-A, subsection 3, paragraph A,
subparagraph (1).
1. Participation in regular classes. A student receiving home instruction enrolled in
an equivalent instruction program may enroll and participate in specific day school classes
at the appropriate public school if each of the following conditions is met.
A. The student, or the student's parent or guardian, on the student's behalf, applies in
writing to and receives written approval from the superintendent or the superintendent's
designee. Approval for enrollment may not be unreasonably withheld by the
superintendent or the superintendent's designee.
B. The student can demonstrate prior satisfactory demonstrates academic achievement
consistent with school administrative unit policy and procedures applicable to all
students.
C. The student shall comply complies with behavioral, disciplinary, attendance and
other classroom rules applicable to all students. If a student fails to comply, the school
may withhold credit or terminate the student's participation.
D. Transportation must be is provided by the parent or guardian or student. The
student may use the same transportation as all other students in the school
administrative unit, as long as additional expenses are not incurred.
E. The student shall complete completes all assignments and tests as required of all
students in the class.
F. A home-schooled student may audit a course in accordance with established local
policy at the appropriate public school under the following conditions.
(1) The student or the student's parent or guardian, on behalf of the student, applies
in writing to and receives written approval from the superintendent or the
superintendent's designee to audit a specific course or courses. Participation may
not be unreasonably withheld.
(2) The student agrees to meet established behavioral, disciplinary, attendance and
other classroom rules applicable to all students. If a student fails to comply, the
school may terminate participation.
Page 1 - 132LR0557(01)

1-A. Auditing courses in public school. A student enrolled in an equivalent
instruction program may audit a course in accordance with established local policy at the
appropriate public school under the following conditions.
A. The student, or the student's parent or guardian on behalf of the student, applies in
writing to the superintendent or the superintendent's designee to audit a specific course
or courses. Participation may not be unreasonably withheld.
B. The student agrees to meet established behavioral, disciplinary, attendance and
other classroom rules applicable to all students. If a student fails to comply, the school
may terminate the student's participation.
2. Academic credit. A student receiving home-school instruction enrolled in an
equivalent instruction program must receive academic credit subject to the following
requirements.
A. Academic credit for individual courses must be awarded if the student meets
required academic standards applicable to all students enrolled in the same course.
B. Academic credit must be awarded for successful completion of alternative
instruction opportunities sponsored by the school and available to all students.
3. Special education services. A student receiving home-school instruction enrolled
in an equivalent instruction program is eligible for special education services, as provided
under federal regulations, in accordance with section 5001‑A and relevant department
procedures and standards.
4. Participation in cocurricular activities. A student receiving home-school
instruction enrolled in an equivalent instruction program is eligible to participate in
cocurricular activities sponsored by the local school administrative unit provided the
following requirements are met.
A. The student, or the student's parent or guardian, on behalf of the student, applies in
writing to and receives written approval from the principal of the school or the
principal's designee. Participation may not be unreasonably withheld.
B. The student agrees to meet established behavioral, disciplinary, attendance and
other rules applicable to all students.
5. Participation in extracurricular activities. Students receiving home-school
instruction enrolled in an equivalent instruction program are eligible to try out for
extracurricular activities sponsored by the local school administrative unit, provided the
student applies in writing, if the following requirements are satisfied.
A. The student agrees to abide by equivalent rules of participation as are applicable to
regularly enrolled students participating in the activity and provides evidence that the
rules of participation are being met.
B. The student complies with the same physical examination, immunization,
insurance, age and semester eligibility requirements as regularly enrolled students
participating in the activity. All required documentation must be made available upon
request by the school administrative unit.
Page 2 - 132LR0557(01)

C. The student meets equivalent academic standards as those established for regularly
enrolled students participating in the activity and provides evidence that the academic
standards are being met.
D. The student abides by the same transportation policy as regularly enrolled students
participating in the activity.
6. Use of school facilities and equipment. A student receiving home-school
instruction enrolled in an equivalent instruction program may use public school facilities
and equipment on the same basis as regularly enrolled students if the following conditions
are met:
A. Use does not disrupt regular school activities;
B. Use is approved by the school principal in accordance with established school
policy;
C. Use does not create additional expense to the school administrative unit;
D. Use is directly related to the student's academic program; and
E. Use of potentially hazardous areas, such as shops, laboratories and the gymnasium,
is supervised by a qualified employee of the school administrative unit.
6-A. Use of public facilities. An equivalent instruction program may enter into an
agreement to use facilities on property owned or leased by a library, community service
organization, museum, performing arts venue, theater, cinema or church facility if:
A. The property is being used solely for the purpose of operating a facility described
in this subsection;
B. The facility is or was actively used for the purpose of operating a facility described
in this subsection within 5 years of any executed agreement for an equivalent
instruction program to use the facility; and
C. The facility follows the state and local health, safety and welfare laws, codes and
rules applicable to that facility, including fire safety and building safety.
7. Use of school textbooks and library books. Subject to availability, a student
receiving home instruction enrolled in an equivalent instruction program may use school
textbooks if the number of particular copies are is sufficient and library books owned by
the school administrative unit subject to the following conditions:
A. Use does not disrupt regular student, staff or special program functions;
B. The student's sign-out period for a library book is the same as that applicable to
regularly enrolled students;
C. The student may sign out a textbook for a period not to exceed one year; and
D. The parent or guardian and student agree to reimburse the school administrative
unit for lost, unreturned or damaged library books and textbooks and for consumable
supplies used.
8. Reimbursement for students enrolled in equivalent instruction programs. A
school administrative unit is entitled to receive state subsidy for any student who receives
instruction through one or more on-site academic courses from a public school but is not a
full-time student. A school administrative unit that sends any tuition student to another
Page 3 - 132LR0557(01)

412 school administrative unit or to a private school approved pursuant to chapter 219 is also
423 entitled to receive state subsidy under this subsection. The rate of reimbursement must be
434 established in increments of 0.25 full-time equivalent status up to 1.0 full-time equivalent
445 status based on the average amount of time per day that a student receives on-site academic
456 services from a public school. School administrative units shall keep an accurate count of
467 the number of students receiving on-site academic services and shall include the full-time
478 equivalency status of these students in the annual count of students attending school in
489 accordance with section 6004.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §5021-A, as amended by PL 2013, c. 428, §§1 to 5, is repealed.